Louisiana, session 2026, HB537.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
5 Section 1. R.S. 23:1294 and R.S. 36:309(B)(2) are hereby repealed in their entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.